Illinois, session 104th, HB2462.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Epinephrine Injector Act is amended by 5changing Sections 5, 10, 15, and 20 and by adding Section 25 as 6follows: 7    (410 ILCS 27/5)8    Sec. 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:9    "Administer" means to directly apply an epinephrine 10delivery system injector to the body of an individual.11    "Authorized entity" means any entity or organization, 12other than a school covered under Section 22-30 of the School 13Code, in connection with or at which allergens capable of 14causing anaphylaxis may be present, including, but not limited 15to, independent contractors who provide student transportation 16to schools, recreation camps, colleges and universities, day 17care facilities, youth sports leagues, amusement parks, 18restaurants, sports arenas, and places of employment. The 19Department shall, by rule, determine what constitutes a day 20care facility under this definition.21    "Authorized individual" means an individual who has 22successfully completed the training program under Section 10 23of this Act.   HB2462 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 08649 BDA 18702 b1    "Department" means the Department of Public Health.2    "Epinephrine delivery system" means any form of 3epinephrine that is approved by the United States Food and 4Drug Administration, including any device that contains a dose 5of epinephrine, and that is used to administer epinephrine 6into the human body to prevent or treat a life-threatening 7allergic reaction. 8    "Epinephrine injector" includes an auto-injector approved 9by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the 10administration of epinephrine and a pre-filled syringe 11approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration and 12used for the administration of epinephrine that contains a 13pre-measured dose of epinephrine that is equivalent to the 14dosages used in an auto-injector. 15    "Health care practitioner" means a physician licensed to 16practice medicine in all its branches under the Medical 17Practice Act of 1987, a physician assistant under the 18Physician Assistant Practice Act of 1987 with prescriptive 19authority, or an advanced practice registered nurse with 20prescribing authority under Article 65 of the Nurse Practice 21Act.22    "Pharmacist" has the meaning given to that term under 23subsection (k-5) of Section 3 of the Pharmacy Practice Act.24    "Undesignated epinephrine injector" means an epinephrine 25injector prescribed in the name of an authorized entity.26(Source: P.A. 99-711, eff. 1-1-17; 100-513, eff. 1-1-18;   HB2462 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 08649 BDA 18702 b1100-799, eff. 1-1-19.) 2    (410 ILCS 27/10)3    Sec. 10. Prescription to authorized entity; use; training.4    (a) A health care practitioner may prescribe epinephrine 5injectors in the name of an authorized entity or authorized 6individual for use in accordance with this Act, and 7pharmacists and health care practitioners may dispense 8epinephrine delivery systems injectors pursuant to a 9prescription issued in the name of an authorized entity or 10authorized individual. Such prescriptions shall be valid for a 11period of 2 years.12    (a-1) A health care provider with prescribing authority 13who is employed by or under contract with the Department may 14issue a statewide standing order for the dispensing of 15epinephrine delivery systems for use under subsection (c) by 16authorized individuals or by employees or agents of authorized 17entities who have completed the training required by 18subsection (d). 19    (b) An authorized entity or authorized individual may 20acquire and stock a supply of undesignated epinephrine 21delivery systems injectors pursuant to a prescription issued 22under subsection (a) of this Section. Such undesignated 23epinephrine delivery systems injectors shall be stored in a 24location readily accessible in an emergency and in accordance 25with the instructions for use of the epinephrine delivery   HB2462 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 08649 BDA 18702 b1systems injectors. The Department may establish any additional 2requirements an authorized entity or authorized individual 3must follow under this Act.4    (c) An employee or agent of an authorized entity who is an 5authorized individual or any other individual who is an 6authorized individual has completed training under subsection 7(d) of this Section may:8        (1) anywhere allergens capable of causing anaphylaxis 9    may be present provide an epinephrine delivery system 10    injector to any individual on the property of the 11    authorized entity whom the employee, agent, or other 12    individual believes in good faith is experiencing 13    anaphylaxis, or to the parent, guardian, or caregiver of 14    such individual, for immediate administration, regardless 15    of whether the individual has a prescription for an 16    epinephrine delivery system injector or has previously 17    been diagnosed with an allergy; or18        (2) anywhere allergens capable of causing anaphylaxis 19    may be present administer an epinephrine delivery system 20    injector to any individual on the property of the 21    authorized entity whom the employee, agent, or other 22    individual believes in good faith is experiencing 23    anaphylaxis, regardless of whether the individual has a 24    prescription for an epinephrine delivery system injector 25    or has previously been diagnosed with an allergy.26    (d) An employee, agent, or other individual authorized   HB2462 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 08649 BDA 18702 b1must complete an anaphylaxis training program before he or she 2is able to provide or administer an epinephrine delivery 3system injector under this Section. Such training shall be 4valid for a period of 2 years and shall be conducted by a 5nationally recognized organization experienced in training 6laypersons in emergency health treatment. The Department shall 7include links to training providers' websites on its website.8    Training shall include, but is not limited to:9        (1) how to recognize signs and symptoms of an allergic 10    reaction, including anaphylaxis;11        (2) how to administer an epinephrine delivery system 12    injector; and13        (3) a test demonstrating competency of the knowledge 14    required to recognize anaphylaxis and administer an 15    epinephrine delivery system injector.16    Training may also include, but is not limited to:17        (A) a review of high-risk areas on the authorized 18    entity's property and its related facilities;19        (B) steps to take to prevent exposure to allergens;20        (C) emergency follow-up procedures; and21        (D) other criteria as determined in rules adopted 22    pursuant to this Act.23    Training may be conducted either online or in person. The 24entity or individual conducting the training shall issue a 25certificate to each person who successfully completes the 26anaphylaxis training program. The Department shall approve   HB2462 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 08649 BDA 18702 b1training programs and list permitted training programs on the 2Department's Internet website.3(Source: P.A. 99-711, eff. 1-1-17; 100-799, eff. 1-1-19.) 4    (410 ILCS 27/15)5    Sec. 15. Costs. Whichever entity initiates the process of 6obtaining undesignated epinephrine delivery systems injectors 7and providing training to personnel for carrying and 8administering undesignated epinephrine delivery systems 9injectors shall pay for the costs of the undesignated 10epinephrine delivery systems injectors.11(Source: P.A. 99-711, eff. 1-1-17; 100-799, eff. 1-1-19.) 12    (410 ILCS 27/20)13    Sec. 20. Limitations. The use of an undesignated 14epinephrine delivery system injector in accordance with the 15requirements of this Act does not constitute the practice of 16medicine or any other profession that requires medical 17licensure.18    Nothing in this Act shall limit the amount of epinephrine 19delivery systems injectors that an authorized entity or 20individual may carry or maintain a supply of.21(Source: P.A. 99-711, eff. 1-1-17; 100-799, eff. 1-1-19.) 22    (410 ILCS 27/25 new)23    Sec. 25. Liability limitation. An authorized individual   HB2462 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 08649 BDA 18702 b1who acts in good faith to provide or administer an epinephrine 2delivery system in an emergency situation pursuant to this 3Act, shall not, as a result of the authorized individual's 4acts, except for willful and wanton misconduct on the part of 5that individual, be liable for civil damages to a person to 6whom such epinephrine delivery system was given to or 7administered. This limitation of liability applies only to the 8act of providing or administering the epinephrine delivery 9system and shall not extend to any other care or treatment 10provided at or around the time of the epinephrine delivery 11system administration.